test/src/gt-norm-yamls/proper-smi_gt-norm.yaml
  Propernoun - Nordmål: # BERN-org
    Nordmål+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Nom: Nordmål 
    Nordmål+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Gen: Nordmåla
    Nordmål+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Acc: Nordmålav
    Nordmål+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Ine: Nordmålan
    Nordmål+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Ill: Nordmålaj
    Nordmål+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Ela: Nordmålas
    Nordmål+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Com: Nordmålajn
    Nordmål+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Pl+Nom: Nordmåla
    Nordmål+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Pl+Ine: Nordmålajn
    Nordmål+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Ess: Nordmålan
    Nordmål+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Der/lasj+N+Sg+Nom: []
    Nordmål+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Gen+Der/k+N+Sg+Nom: []
    
  Propernoun - Reinsamelag: # BERN-LOAN-org
    Reinsamelag+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Nom: Reinsamelag 
    Reinsamelag+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Gen: []
    Reinsamelag+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Acc: []
    Reinsamelag+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Ine: []
    Reinsamelag+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Ill: []
    Reinsamelag+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Ela: []
    Reinsamelag+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Com: []
    Reinsamelag+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Pl+Nom: []
    Reinsamelag+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Pl+Ine: []
    Reinsamelag+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Ess: []
    Reinsamelag+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Der/lasj+N+Sg+Nom: []
    Reinsamelag+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Gen+Der/k+N+Sg+Nom: [] 
    
  Propernoun - Repvåg: # BERN-LOAN-plc
    Repvåg+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Nom: Repvåg 
    Repvåg+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen: []
    Repvåg+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Acc: []
    Repvåg+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ine: []
    Repvåg+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ill: []
    Repvåg+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ela: []
    Repvåg+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Com: []
    Repvåg+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Nom: []
    Repvåg+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Ine: []
    Repvåg+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Ess: []
    Repvåg+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/lasj+N+Sg+Nom: []
    Repvåg+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen+Der/k+N+Sg+Nom: [] 
    
  Propernoun - Ruoktomet: # BERN-LOAN-obj
    Ruoktomet+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Nom: Ruoktomet 
    Ruoktomet+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Gen: []
    Ruoktomet+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Acc: []
    Ruoktomet+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Ine: []
    Ruoktomet+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Ill: []
    Ruoktomet+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Ela: []
    Ruoktomet+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Com: []
    Ruoktomet+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Pl+Nom: []
    Ruoktomet+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Pl+Ine: []
    Ruoktomet+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Ess: []
    Ruoktomet+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Der/lasj+N+Sg+Nom: []
    Ruoktomet+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Gen+Der/k+N+Sg+Nom: [] 
  
  Propernoun - Sommarøy: # OY-plc, same as BERN
    Sommarøy+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Nom: Sommarøy 
    Sommarøy+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen: Sommarøya
    Sommarøy+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Acc: Sommarøyav
    Sommarøy+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ine: Sommarøyan
    Sommarøy+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ill: Sommarøyaj
    Sommarøy+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ela: Sommarøyas
    Sommarøy+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Com: Sommarøyajn
    Sommarøy+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Nom: Sommarøya
    Sommarøy+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Ine: Sommarøyajn
    Sommarøy+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Ess: Sommarøyan
    Sommarøy+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/lasj+N+Sg+Nom: sommarøyalasj
    Sommarøy+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen+Der/k+N+Sg+Nom: sommarøyak 
  
  Propernoun - Israel: # LONDONBERN-plc
    Israel+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Nom: Israel 
    Israel+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen: Israela
    Israel+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Acc: Israelav
    Israel+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ine: [Israelin, Israelan]
    Israel+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ill: [Israelij, Israelaj]
    Israel+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ela: [Israelis, Israelas]
    Israel+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Com: [Israelijn, Israelajn]
    Israel+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Nom: Israela
    Israel+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Ine: [Israelijn, Israelajn]
    Israel+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Ess: [Israelin, Israelan]
    Israel+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/lasj+N+Sg+Nom: israelalasj
    Israel+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen+Der/k+N+Sg+Nom: israelak
 
  Propernoun - Drangajökull: # JOKULL-plc, same as LONDON
    Drangajökull+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Nom: Drangajökull 
    Drangajökull+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen: Drangajökulla
    Drangajökull+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Acc: Drangajökullav
    Drangajökull+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ine: Drangajökullin
    Drangajökull+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ill: Drangajökullij
    Drangajökull+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ela: Drangajökullis
    Drangajökull+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Com: Drangajökullijn
    Drangajökull+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Nom: Drangajökulla
    Drangajökull+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Ine: Drangajökullijn
    Drangajökull+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Ess: Drangajökullin
    Drangajökull+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/lasj+N+Sg+Nom: []
    Drangajökull+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen+Der/k+N+Sg+Nom: [] 
  
  Propernoun - Inkeri: # ERVASTI-fem, same as ACCRA
    Inkeri+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Nom: Inkeri 
    Inkeri+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Gen: Inkeri
    Inkeri+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Acc: Inkeriv
    Inkeri+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Ine: Inkerin
    Inkeri+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Ill: Inkerij
    Inkeri+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Ela: Inkeris
    Inkeri+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Com: Inkerijn
    Inkeri+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Pl+Nom: Inkeri
    Inkeri+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Pl+Ine: Inkerijn
    Inkeri+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Ess: Inkerin
    Inkeri+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Der/lasj+N+Sg+Nom: []
    Inkeri+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Gen+Der/k+N+Sg+Nom: []
 
  Propernoun - Alajärvi: # MAKI-plc, same as ACCRA
    Alajärvi+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Nom: Alajärvi 
    Alajärvi+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen: Alajärvi
    Alajärvi+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Acc: Alajärviv
    Alajärvi+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ine: Alajärvin
    Alajärvi+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ill: Alajärvij
    Alajärvi+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ela: Alajärvis
    Alajärvi+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Com: Alajärvijn
    Alajärvi+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Nom: Alajärvi
    Alajärvi+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Ine: Alajärvijn
    Alajärvi+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Ess: Alajärvin
    Alajärvi+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/lasj+N+Sg+Nom: alajärvilasj
    Alajärvi+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen+Der/k+N+Sg+Nom: alajärvik
  
  Propernoun - Autioniemi: # NIEMI, same as ACCRA
    Autioniemi+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Nom: Autioniemi 
    Autioniemi+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen: Autioniemi
    Autioniemi+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Acc: Autioniemiv
    Autioniemi+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ine: Autioniemin
    Autioniemi+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ill: Autioniemij
    Autioniemi+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ela: Autioniemis
    Autioniemi+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Com: Autioniemijn
    Autioniemi+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Nom: Autioniemi
    Autioniemi+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Ine: Autioniemijn
    Autioniemi+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Ess: Autioniemin
    Autioniemi+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/lasj+N+Sg+Nom: autioniemilasj
    Autioniemi+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen+Der/k+N+Sg+Nom: autioniemik
  
  Propernoun - Taattola: # HANNOLA-sur, same as ACCRA
    Taattola+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Nom: Taattola 
    Taattola+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Gen: Taattola
    Taattola+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Acc: Taattolav
    Taattola+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Ine: Taattolan
    Taattola+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Ill: Taattolaj
    Taattola+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Ela: Taattolas
    Taattola+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Com: Taattolajn
    Taattola+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Pl+Nom: Taattola
    Taattola+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Pl+Ine: Taattolajn
    Taattola+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Ess: Taattolan
    Taattola+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Der/lasj+N+Sg+Nom: []
    Taattola+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Gen+Der/k+N+Sg+Nom: []
